en: pea protein
bg: грахов протеин
ca: Proteïna de pèsol
cs: hrachový protein, hrachová bílkovina
da: Ærteprotein
de: Erbsenprotein, erbseneiweiß, Erbseneiweiss
es: Proteína de guisante
fi: herneproteiini
fr: protéines de pois, protéine de pois
hr: bjelančevine graška, bjelančevina graška, protein graška
hu: borsófehérje
it: proteine di piselli
lv: zirņu proteīns
nl: boneneiwit, erwteiwit, erwteneiwit, erwteneiwitten
pl: białko grochu, białka grochu, białka grochowego, białko grochowe
pt: Proteína de ervilha
ro: proteină de mazăre, proteină din mazăre, proteine din mazăre
ru: Гороховый протеин
sv: Ärtprotein, protein från ärtor

en: pea protein isolate
cs: izolovaný hrachový protein
de: Erbsenproteinisolat
es: aislado de proteina de guisante
fi: herneproteiini-isolaatti
fr: isolat de protéines de pois
hr: izolat proteina graška
hu: borsófehérje izolátum
it: proteine isolate del pisello
pl: izolowane białko grochowe
ro: izolat proteic de mazăre
sv: ärtproteinisolat

en: textured pea protein, textured pea proteins
de: texturiertes Erbseneiweiß
fr: protéines de pois texturées, protéine de pois texturée, protéines texturées de pois
hr: teksturirani proteini graška, teksturiranog proteina graška
it: proteine di pisello testurizzate
pl: teksturat białka grochu, teksturowane białko grochu
ro: texturat proteic de mazăre

en: rehydrated pea protein
de: Rehydriertes Erbsenprotein, Erbsenprotein rehydriert
fi: vedellä turvotettu herneproteiini
hr: rehidrirani protein graška
it: proteine di piselli reidratate
sv: rehydrerat ärtprotein

en: broad bean protein
de: Ackerbohnenprotein, Ackerbohneneiweiß
fi: härkäpapuproteiini
fr: protéine de fèves, protéines de fèves
hr: proteina boba
it: proteina di fava
nl: tuinbooneiwit
pl: białko bobu, białka bobu
ro: proteină de bob
sv: bondbönsprotein, protein från bondböna

en: chickpea protein
de: Kichererbsenprotein
fi: kikherneproteiini
fr: protéine de pois chiche
hr: proteina slanutka
it: proteina di ceci

en: sunflower protein
de: Sonnenblumeneiweiß, Sonnenblumenprotein, Eiweißpulver aus Sonnenblumenkernen
fr: protéine de tournesol
hr: suncokretovih bjelančevina, suncokretove bjelančevine, proteini suncokreta
it: proteine di girasole
pl: białko słonecznika, białko słonecznikowe, białka słonecznika
ro: proteină de floarea-soarelui

en: sunflower and rice proteins
hr: suncokretovih bjelančevina i riže
it: proteine di girasole e riso

en: potato protein
bg: картофен протеин
de: kartoffeleiweiß, kartoffelprotein
fi: perunaproteiini
fr: protéine de pomme de terre, protéines de pomme de terre
hr: protein krumpira
it: proteina di patata
nl: aardappeleiwit
pl: białko ziemniaczane
pt: Proteína de batata
ro: proteină de cartofi
sv: potatisprotein

en: hydrolysed vegetable protein, HVP, vegetable hydrolysed proteins
ca: Proteïna vegetal hidrolitzada
cs: Hydrolyzované rostlinné bílkoviny
da: hydrolyseret vegetabilsk protein, hydrolyseret vegetabllsk protein, hydrolysert vegetabilsk protein
de: hydrolysiertes Pflanzenprotein, aufgeschlossenes Pflanzeneiweiß, aufgeschlossenes Pflanzenprotein, hydrolysiertes Pflanzeneiweiß
es: Proteina vegetal hidrolizada, hidrolizado de proteína vegetal
fi: hydrolysoitu kasviproteiini, kasviproteiinihydrosylaatti
fr: protéine végétale hydrolysée, protéines végétales hydrolysées
hr: hidrolizirane biljne bjelančevine, hidrolizirane bjelančevine povrća
hu: hidrolizált növényi fehérjék, hidolizált növényi fehérje
it: Proteine vegetali idrolisse
lv: hidrolizēts augu proteīns
nb: hydrolysert vegetabilsk protein
nl: gehydroliseerde plantaardige eiwit, gehydroliseerd plantaardig eiwit, gehydrolyseerd plantaardig eiwit, gehydroliseerde plantaardige eiwitten
pl: Hydrolizowane białko roślinne, hydrolizat białka roślinnego, hydrolizowane białka roślinne
sv: hydrolyserat vegetabiliskt protein, hydroliserat vegetabiliskt protein
zh: 酸水解植物蛋白

en: hydrolysed pea protein, hydrolyzed pea protein
da: hydrolyseret ærteprotein
de: hydrolysiertes Erbsenprotein, hydrolisiertes Erbsenprotein
es: proteína de guisante hidrolizada, proteínas de guisante hidrolizadas
fi: hydrolysoitu herneproteiini, herneproteiinihydrosylaatti
fr: protéines de pois hydrolysées
hr: hidrolizirani protein graška
it: proteina di pisello idrolizzata
pl: hydrolizowane białko grochu, hydrolizat białka grochu
sv: hydrolyserat ärtprotein

en: hydrolysed rice protein, hydrolyzed rice protein
da: hydrolyseret risprotein
de: hydrolisiertes Reisprotein
fr: protéine de riz hydrolysée
it: proteine di riso idrolizzate
pl: hydrolizat białka ryżowego, hydrolizowane białko ryżowe

en: hydrolysed sunflower protein, hydrolyzed sunflower protein
da: hydrolyseret solsikkeprotein
it: proteina di girasole idrolizzata
pl: hydrolizat białka słonecznikowego, hydrolizowane białko słonecznikowe, hydrolizat białka słonecznika

en: soy protein
bg: соев протеин, соев белтък, соеви протеини
ca: proteïna de soja
cs: sójová bílkovina, sójová bilkovina
da: sojaprotein
de: Sojaprotein, Sojaproteine, Sojaeiweiß, Sojaeiweiss
es: Proteina de soya, proteina de soja, proteina vegetal hidrolizada de soya
et: sojavalk
fi: soijaproteiini, soijaproteiinivalmiste
fr: protéine de soja, protéines de soja
hr: bjelančevine soje, hidrolizat sojinih bjelančevina, sojine bjelančevine, bjelančevina soje, sojini proteini
hu: szójafehérje
it: proteine di soia
ja: 大豆たんぱく, 大豆タンパク, 大豆たん白
lv: sojas proteīns
nl: soja-eiwit, sojaeiwitten
pl: Białko sojowe, białko soi, białko z soi, białka sojowego
pt: Proteína de soja
ro: proteină de soia, proteina de soia, proteină vegetală din soia, proteina vegetala din soia
ru: Соевый протеин, соевый белок
sk: sójová bielkovina
sl: sojini proteini
sv: sojaprotein, sojaproteinpeparat

en: rehydrated textured soy protein
cs: rehydovaný sójový texturát, rehydrovaná texturovaná sojová bílkovina

en: soy protein product
de: Sojaeiweißerzeugnis
fr: produit à base de protéines de soja
it: prodotto proteico di soia

en: proteic extruded soy, proteic extrusion of soy
it: estruso proteico di soia

en: soy fiber
de: Sojafaser
es: fibra de soja
fi: soijakuitu
fr: fibres de soja
hr: sojina vlakna
it: fibre di soia
lt: sojų ląsteliena
nl: sojavezel
pl: błonnik sojowy, błonnik z soi
pt: fibra de soja

en: rehydrated soy fiber
de: Rehydrierte Sojafaser, rehydrierte Sojafasern
es: fibra de soja rehidratada
fr: Fibre de soja réhydratée
hr: rehidrirana sojina vlakna
it: fibre di soia reidratate

en: dehydrated soy protein
bg: дехидратиран соев протеин
es: Proteína de soja deshidratada
fi: dehydratoitu soijaproteiini
fr: protéines de soja déshydratées
hr: dehidrirani protein soje
hu: dehidratált szójafehérje
it: proteine di soia disidratate